Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-272
Assignment of partnership interest.

(a) Except as provided in the partnership agreement: (1) A partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part; (2) an assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights or powers of a partner; (3) an assignment entitles the assignee to share in such profits and losses and to receive such distribution or distributions and such allocation of income, gain, loss, deduction, credit, or similar item to which the assignor would be entitled to the extent assigned; and (4) a partner ceases to be a partner and to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a partner upon assignment of all his or her partnership interest and the admission of the assignee to the partnership in accordance with section 67-274.

(b) The partnership agreement may provide that a partner's interest in a limited partnership may be evidenced by a certificate of partnership interest issued by the limited partnership and may also provide for the assignment or transfer of any partnership interest represented by such a certificate and make other provisions with respect to such certificates.

(c) Unless otherwise provided in a partnership agreement and except to the extent assumed by agreement, until an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a partner, the assignee shall have no liability as a partner solely as a result of the assignment.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 40;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 45.